Mississippi, session 2026, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Short Title.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Medical Education Pipeline and Readiness Act". SECTION 2.  Legislative Findings and Purpose.  (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Mississippi faces persistent physician shortages, particularly in rural and underserved communities; (b)  The state has significant racial, geographic, and socioeconomic disparities in access to medical education and healthcare careers; (c)  Early exposure, structured preparation, and continuous academic support are proven strategies for increasing the number of students who successfully matriculate into medical school; and (d)  Mississippi lacks a unified, statewide pipeline connecting K12 education, public higher education, and the University of Mississippi Medical Center. (2)  The purpose of this act is to: (a)  Establish a coordinated medical education pipeline beginning in high school and continuing through undergraduate study; (b)  Set uniform readiness standards for students pursuing medical education; (c)  Increase the number of Mississippi students admitted to medical school; (d)  Improve diversity in the medical workforce; and (e)  Strengthen the state's health care delivery capacity. SECTION 3.  Creation of the Mississippi Medical Education Pipeline Program.  There is established the Mississippi Medical Education Pipeline Program (MMEPP), a statewide initiative jointly administered by: (a)  The Mississippi Department of Education (MDE); (b)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning (IHL); and (c)  The University of Mississippi Medical Center (UMMC). The program shall provide a structured pathway from high school through college for students seeking admission to medical school. SECTION 4.  Duties of the Mississippi Department of Education.  MDE shall: (a)  Identify and designate participating public high schools, with priority given to: (i)  Rural districts; (ii)  High-poverty districts; and (iii)  Historically underrepresented communities; (b)  Establish a Pre-Medical Career Pathway within Career and Technical Education (CTE); (c)  Align high school coursework with medical school readiness standards, including: (i)  Biology; (ii)  Chemistry; (iii)  Physics; (iv)  Algebra II and higher mathematics; (v)  Statistics; (vi)  Health sciences; and (vii) Medical ethics. (d)  Coordinate with IHL and UMMC to provide: (i)  Summer bridge programs; (ii)  Dual-enrollment options; (iii)  Medical career exploration; and (iv)  Shadowing and mentorship. (e)  Develop a statewide advising and counseling framework for pipeline students; and (f)  Collect and report annual participation and outcome data to the Legislature. SECTION 5.  Duties of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.  IHL shall: (a)  Designate participating public universities and colleges; (b)  Establish standardized Pre-Medical Readiness Benchmarks for undergraduate students, including: (i)  Required coursework; (ii)  Minimum GPA thresholds; (iii)  Clinical exposure hours; (iv)  Research participation; (v)  Community service; and (vi)  Leadership development. (c)  Create structured pre-med advising offices at participating institutions; (d)  Guarantee conditional or priority interview consideration for students who complete the pipeline benchmarks, subject to UMMC admissions policies; (e)  Provide academic support services, including: (i)  Tutoring; (ii)  MCAT preparation; (iii)  Peer mentoring; and (iv)  Faculty mentoring. (f)  Develop articulation agreements with MDE for dual-credit and early-college options. SECTION 6.  Duties of the University of Mississippi Medical Center.  UMMC shall: (a)  Establish medical school readiness standards aligned with the pipeline; (b)  Provide early exposure opportunities, including: (i)  Summer medical academies; (ii)  Clinical observation programs; (iii)  Simulation lab experiences; and (iv)  Medical research internships. (c)  Assign medical student and physician mentors to pipeline participants; (d)  Offer conditional acceptance or early assurance pathways for students meeting established benchmarks; (e)  Develop holistic admissions considerations for pipeline completers; and (f)  Provide annual reports on admissions, retention, and completion outcomes. SECTION 7.  Mississippi Medical Pipeline Advisory Council.  (1)  There is created the Mississippi Medical Pipeline Advisory Council, composed of: (a)  The State Superintendent of Public Education or his or her designee; (b)  The Commissioner of Higher Education or his or her designee; (c)  The Vice Chancellor for Health Affairs of UMMC or his or her designee; (d)  Two (2) physicians appointed by the Governor; (e)  Two (2) educators appointed by the Speaker of the House; (f)  Two (2) educators appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (g)  One (1) high school counselor; (h)  One (1) undergraduate advisor; and (i)  Two (2) students currently in the pipeline. (2)  The council shall: (a)  Oversee implementation; (b)  Recommend standards and benchmarks; (c)  Monitor equity and access; (d)  Advise on funding needs; and (e)  Submit an annual report to the Legislature. SECTION 8.  Student Eligibility and Participation.  Students may apply to enter the pipeline beginning in the 9th grade.  Eligibility criteria shall include: (a)  Demonstrated academic interest in health or medical sciences; (b)  Commitment to program requirements; and (c)  Mississippi residency. No minimum GPA may be required for initial high school entry.  No student shall be excluded on the basis of race, gender, disability, or economic status. SECTION 9.  Data Reporting and Accountability.  MDE, IHL and UMMC shall jointly publish an annual report including: (a)  Enrollment numbers; (b)  Demographic breakdowns; (c)  Retention rates; (d)  College matriculation rates; (e)  Medical school application rates; (f)  Acceptance rates; and (g)  Graduation outcomes. SECTION 10.  Funding. The Legislature shall appropriate funds to support: (a)  Program administration; (b)  Staffing; (c)  Student stipends; (d)  Summer programs; (e)  MCAT preparation; (f)  Transportation and housing for internships; and (g)  Evaluation and data systems. The agencies may seek federal, philanthropic, and private grants. SECTION 11. Rulemaking Authority.  MDE, IHL, and UMMC shall jointly promulgate rules necessary to implement this act. SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.